Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.110

Civil and administrative penalties.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

[ 2008 c 108 s 12.]